Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Part 3
Provisions Applicable to Mortgage Loan Originators

§ 26-31-301. Title.

This part 3 of the chapter may be cited as the “Idaho Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act” or the “Idaho S.A.F.E. Mortgage Licensing Act.”

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-301, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 12, p. 142.

§ 26-31-302. Purpose of this part.

The activities of mortgage loan originators and the origination or offering of financing for residential real property have a direct, valuable and immediate impact upon Idaho consumers, Idaho’s economy, the neighborhoods and communities of Idaho, and the housing and real estate industry. The legislature finds that accessibility to mortgage credit is vital to the state’s citizens. The legislature also finds that it is essential for the protection of the citizens of Idaho and the stability of Idaho’s economy that reasonable standards for licensing and regulation of the business practices of mortgage loan originators be imposed. The legislature further finds that the obligations of mortgage loan originators to consumers in connection with originating or making residential mortgage loans are such as to warrant the regulation of the mortgage loan origination process. The purpose of this part is to protect consumers seeking mortgage loans and to ensure that the mortgage industry is operating without unfair, deceptive, and fraudulent practices on the part of mortgage loan originators. Therefore, the legislature establishes within this part an effective system of supervision of mortgage loan originators and enforcement authority, including:

The authority of the director to issue licenses to conduct business under this part, and the authority to promulgate rules and adopt procedures necessary to the licensing of persons covered under this part;

The authority of the director to deny, suspend, condition or revoke licenses issued under this part;

The authority of the director to examine, investigate and conduct enforcement actions as necessary to carry out the intended purposes of this part, including the authority to subpoena witnesses and documents, enter orders, including cease and desist orders, order restitution and monetary penalties, and order the removal and ban of individuals from office or employment.

The director shall have broad administrative authority to administer, interpret and enforce this part, and to promulgate rules and issue orders implementing this part, to carry out the intention of the legislature under this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-302, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-303. Definitions.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

“Depository institution” has the same meaning as in section 3 of the federal deposit insurance act, and includes any credit union.

“Expungement” means, with respect to a record of criminal conviction entered in this state, that no one, including law enforcement, can be permitted access to the record even by court order. With respect to criminal convictions entered in another state, that state’s definition of expungement shall apply.

“Federal banking agency” means the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the comptroller of the currency, the director of the office of thrift supervision, the national credit union administration and the federal deposit insurance corporation.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent or grandchild, and includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings and adoptive relationships.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

For the purposes of this subsection clerical or support duties may include, subsequent to the receipt of an application:

The receipt, collection, distribution and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists or other promotional items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

“Mortgage loan originator” means an individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain takes a residential mortgage loan application, or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.

Mortgage loan originator does not mean the following:

An individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in section 26-31-304(3), Idaho Code;

A person or entity that only performs real estate brokerage activity and is licensed or registered in accordance with Idaho law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator, or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator;

A person or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in 11 U.S.C. section 101(53D); and

An individual who is an employee of a federal, state or local government agency or housing finance agency and who acts as a loan originator only pursuant to his or her official duties as an employee of the federal, state or local government agency or housing finance agency.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor or lessee of real property;

Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property, other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction;

Engaging in any activity for which a person is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under law; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in subparagraphs (i) through (iv) of this paragraph.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a thirty (30) year fixed rate mortgage.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through the NMLSR, who meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and who is an employee of one (1) of the following:

A depository institution;

A subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency; or

An institution regulated by the farm credit administration.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-303, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 13, p. 142.

§ 26-31-304. License and registration required — Exemptions.

Unless specifically exempt under subsection (2) of this section, an individual shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator with respect to any dwelling located in this state without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this part. Each licensed mortgage loan originator shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the NMLSR.

The following are exempt from this part:

Registered mortgage loan originators when acting on behalf of an entity described in section 26-31-303(9) (a) through (c), Idaho Code;

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual;

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan that is secured by a dwelling that serves as the individual’s residence; and

An attorney duly authorized to practice in this state who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator.

A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor may not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter unless such independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a license under subsection (1) of this section. Each independent contractor loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage loan originator must have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

For the purpose of implementing an orderly and efficient application and licensing process, the director may establish licensing rules and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications. For previously registered or licensed individuals, the director may establish expedited review and licensing procedures.

An individual subject to the licensing requirements of this part may obtain temporary authority to originate loans in this state under the conditions of paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

Upon becoming employed by a mortgage broker or lender that is licensed pursuant to this chapter, an individual who is a registered loan originator shall be deemed to have temporary authority to act as a loan originator in this state for the period described in paragraph (c) of this subsection if the individual:

Has not had an application for a loan originator license denied, revoked, or suspended in any governmental jurisdiction;

Has not been subject to or served with a cease and desist order in any governmental jurisdiction nor subject to an action pursuant to 12 U.S.C. 5113(c);

Has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony that would preclude licensure under the laws of this state;

Has submitted an application for a loan originator license under this part; and
(v) Was registered in the NMLSR as a loan originator during the one (1) year period preceding the date on which the information required under this part is submitted.

A loan originator shall be deemed to have temporary authority to act as a loan originator in this state for the period described in paragraph (c) of this subsection if the individual:

Meets the requirements of subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of paragraph (a) of this subsection;

Is employed by a mortgage broker or lender that is licensed pursuant to this act;

Was licensed as a mortgage loan originator in a state other than this state during the thirty (30) day period preceding the date on which the information required under this part was submitted in connection with an application for a mortgage loan originator license.

The period described in this paragraph shall begin on the date on which a loan originator submits the information required under this part in connection with the application for a mortgage loan originator license and end on the earliest of the date:

On which the loan originator withdraws the application for a mortgage loan originator license submitted pursuant to this part;

On which the director denies, or issues a notice of intent to deny, the application;

On which the director grants a mortgage loan originator license; or

That is one hundred twenty (120) days after the date on which the loan originator submits an application, if the application is listed on the NMLSR as incomplete.

Any person employing an individual who, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, is deemed to have temporary authority to act as a loan originator in this state shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter and to applicable law to the same extent as if that individual was a loan originator licensed by this state.

An individual who, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, is deemed to have temporary authority to act as a loan originator in this state and who engages in residential mortgage loan origination activities shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter and to applicable law to the same extent as if that individual was a loan originator licensed by this state.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-304, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 14, p. 142; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 12, p. 260.

§ 26-31-305. License and registration application.

Applicants for a license under this part shall apply through the NMLSR in a form prescribed by the director. Each form shall include such content as the director may reasonably require, shall be updated as necessary to keep the information current and shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of two hundred dollars ($200).

In order to fulfill the purposes of this part, the director may establish relationships or enter into contracts with the NMLSR or other entities designated by the NMLSR to collect and maintain records and to process fees.

Applicants for licensure under this part shall submit the following to the NMLSR:

Fingerprints for submission to the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national and international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the NMLSR, including the authorization for the NMLSR and the director to obtain the following:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the fair credit reporting act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (3)(a) and (b)(ii) of this section, the director may use the NMLSR as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the director may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (3)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the director may use the NMLSR as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the director.

Upon written request, an applicant for a license under this part is entitled to a hearing on the question of his qualifications for a license if:

The director has notified the applicant in writing that his application has been denied and the request for a hearing is made not more than fifteen (15) days after the director mailed the written notification of denial; or

The director has not issued the applicant a license within sixty (60) days after a complete application for the license was filed.

A license application shall be deemed withdrawn and void if an applicant submits an incomplete license application and, after receipt of a written notice of the application deficiency, fails to provide the director with information necessary to complete the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the deficiency notice. A written deficiency notice shall be deemed received by a license applicant when:
(a) Placed in regular U.S. mail by the director or his agent using an address provided by the applicant on the license application; or

The director may suspend action upon an application for a license pursuant to this part pending the resolution of any criminal charge before a court of competent jurisdiction against the applicant which could disqualify the applicant from licensure if the applicant is found guilty of or pleads guilty to the pending charge.

The director may suspend action upon an application for a license pursuant to this part pending resolution of any civil action or administrative proceeding against an applicant that involves any aspect of a financial service business, the outcome of which could disqualify the applicant from licensure.

A license applicant under this part shall make complete disclosure of all information required in the license application. A license applicant or person acting on behalf of the applicant is not liable in any civil action other than a civil action brought by a governmental agency related to an alleged untrue statement made pursuant to this section, unless it is shown that:

The license applicant, or person acting on behalf of the license applicant, knew at the time that the statement was made that it was materially false; or

The license applicant or person acting on behalf of the license applicant acted in reckless disregard as to the truth or falsity of the statement.

If a hearing is held, the applicant shall reimburse, pro rata, the director for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of the hearing. The director shall state, in substance, his findings that support a denial of an application.

(b) E-mailed to the applicant using an e-mail address provided by the applicant on the license application; or

(c) Posted by the director or his agent on the NMLSR.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-305, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 15, p. 142.

§ 26-31-306. Issuance of license — License not assignable or transferable — Inactive license status.

The director shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license under this part unless the director first makes the following findings:

The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license, or other mortgage related license, revoked in any governmental jurisdiction. If such revocation was formally vacated, then it shall not be deemed a revocation for purposes of this section.

The applicant has not been convicted of, found guilty of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court:

During the seven (7) year period immediately preceding the date of the application for licensing or registration; or

At any time preceding such date of application, if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering;

Any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be deemed a conviction for purposes of this section resulting in an automatic denial or revocation of a mortgage loan originator license. The director may consider the underlying crime, facts or circumstances of a pardoned or expunged felony conviction when determining the eligibility of an applicant for licensure under paragraph (d) of this subsection.

The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character and general fitness sufficient to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this part. The director shall not base a license application denial under this part solely on a license applicant’s credit score or credit report. For purposes of this section, a license applicant is not financially responsible if he has shown a disregard for the management of his personal financial affairs. A determination that an individual has not shown financial responsibility may include, but is not limited to, consideration of the following:

A current outstanding judgment, except a judgment issued solely as a result of medical expenses;

A current outstanding tax lien or other government lien or filing;

A foreclosure within the past three (3) years; or

A pattern of delinquent accounts within the past three (3) years.

The applicant has successfully completed the prelicensing education requirement pursuant to section 26-31-307, Idaho Code.

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement pursuant to section 26-31-308, Idaho Code.

The applicant has met the mortgage recovery fund requirement pursuant to section 26-31-110, Idaho Code.

The applicant has provided information on the application as required in section 26-31-305, Idaho Code.

The director may conduct investigations as he deems necessary to determine the existence of the requirements listed in this section.

A license issued under this part is not assignable or transferable.

A mortgage loan originator whose license is placed on inactive status under this part shall not act as a mortgage loan originator in this state until the license is activated.
(5) The director shall place a mortgage loan originator license on inactive status upon the occurrence of any of the following:

A mortgage loan originator license application is submitted and approved prior to the filing and approval of a loan originator’s relationship and sponsorship by an employing licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender or by an exempt entity;

Receipt of a notice from either the licensed mortgage broker, mortgage lender, registrant, exempt entity or mortgage loan originator that the mortgage loan originator’s sponsored relationship as an employee or independent agent of a licensed mortgage broker, mortgage lender or exempt entity has been terminated; or

The surrender, expiration, suspension or revocation of the employing licensed mortgage broker’s, mortgage lender’s or exempt entity’s license.

(6) If a mortgage loan originator license is designated as inactive under this part, then it shall remain in that status unless and until it is surrendered, revoked, suspended, expired or is activated.

(7) A mortgage loan originator who holds an inactive mortgage loan originator license may renew such inactive license if he or she remains otherwise eligible for renewal pursuant to section 26-31-309, Idaho Code. Such renewal shall not activate the license from an inactive status.

(8) The director may activate a mortgage loan originator license upon receipt of a filing through the NMLSR indicating that the mortgage loan originator licensee has been employed and sponsored as a mortgage loan originator by a licensed mortgage broker, mortgage lender or by an exempt entity registrant and if such mortgage loan originator meets the conditions for licensing under this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-306, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 16, p. 142.

§ 26-31-307. Prelicensing and relicensing education of mortgage loan originators.

All individuals seeking a mortgage loan originator license under this part shall satisfy the prelicensing education requirement by completing at least twenty (20) hours of course instruction that has been approved by the NMLSR and administered by a provider approved by the NMLSR. Course instruction shall include:

Three (3) hours minimum of instruction on federal law and regulation;

Three (3) hours minimum of instruction on ethics, which shall include fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues;

Two (2) hours minimum of instruction on lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace; and

Two (2) hours minimum of instruction directly related to this chapter and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course approved by the NMLSR that is provided by the applicant’s employer, an entity affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

The prelicensing education may be completed in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the NMLSR.

The prelicensing education requirements approved by the NMLSR in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit toward completion of prelicensing education requirements in Idaho.

An individual licensed prior to the effective date of this part who is applying to be relicensed shall submit proof that he has completed all of the continuing education requirements for the year in which the license was last held.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-307, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-308. Testing of mortgage loan originators.

All individuals seeking a mortgage loan originator license under this part shall satisfy the written test requirement by passing a qualified written test developed by the NMLSR and administered by a provider approved by the NMLSR based upon reasonable standards and subject to subsection (2) of this section.

A written test shall not be deemed a qualified written test for purposes of subsection (1) of this section unless it tests the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in the following subject areas:

Ethics;

Federal and state law and regulation pertaining to mortgage loan origination;

Federal and state law and regulation pertaining to fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the NMLSR from administering a written test at the applicant’s place of employment, at the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the applicant’s employer or at the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

In order to pass a qualified written test, an individual must achieve a test score of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to questions.

An individual may retake a qualified written test two (2) times with each test occurring at least thirty (30) days after the preceding test. If an individual does not achieve a passing score on a qualified written test upon retake number two (2), then the individual shall wait at least six (6) months before retaking a written test.

A mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license under this part for a period of five (5) years or longer shall, as a condition of obtaining a new license under this part, retake and pass a qualified written test, not taking into account any time during which such individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-308, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 17, p. 142.

§ 26-31-309. License renewal and reinstatement requirements.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators licensed under this part shall include the following:

The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance pursuant to section 26-31-306, Idaho Code;

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements pursuant to section 26-31-310, Idaho Code; and

The mortgage loan originator has filed with the director through the NMLSR, on or before December 31 of each year, a renewal application containing such information as the director may require, accompanied by a nonrefundable annual license renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

If a mortgage loan originator fails to timely satisfy the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-5254, Idaho Code, then his license automatically and immediately expires.

The director may reinstate an expired license during the time period of January 1 through February 28, immediately following license expiration if the director finds that the former licensee meets the requirements for licensure under this part after submission to the director of:

A complete application for renewal;

The fees required to apply for license renewal unless previously paid for the period for which the license renewal applies; and

A reinstatement fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-309, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 18, p. 142.

§ 26-31-310. Continuing education for mortgage loan originators.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements, a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight (8) hours of education each year, which shall include:

Three (3) hours minimum of instruction on federal law and regulation;

Two (2) hours minimum of instruction on ethics, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues;

Two (2) hours minimum of instruction on lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace; and

One (1) hour minimum of instruction directly related to this chapter and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

All continuing education courses and course providers shall be reviewed and approved by the NMLSR based upon reasonable standards.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any approved education course that is provided by the mortgage loan originator’s employer or an entity which is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education courses may be completed either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the NMLSR.

A licensed mortgage loan originator may only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken, except as provided in section 26-31-309(3), Idaho Code, and subsection (9) of this section, and may not take the same approved course in the same or successive years in order to meet the annual continuing education requirements.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor may receive credit toward his required annual continuing education hours at the rate of two (2) hours of credit for every one (1) hour of instruction of an approved continuing education course.

An individual having successfully completed the continuing education requirements described in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section for any state shall be awarded credit toward completion of continuing education requirements in Idaho.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who subsequently becomes unlicensed shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license.

An individual meeting the requirements of section 26-31-309(1)(a) and (c), Idaho Code, may make up any deficiency in continuing education requirements as established by rule of the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-310, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 19, p. 142.

§ 26-31-311. Authority to require license and registration.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the director by law, the director shall require mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the NMLSR. In order to carry out this requirement the director is authorized to participate in the NMLSR. For this purpose, the director may establish by rule or order requirements for licensure as a mortgage loan originator, as necessary including, but not limited to:

Background checks, to include:

Criminal history, through fingerprint or other databases;

Civil or administrative records;

Credit history; and

Any other information as deemed necessary by the NMLSR.

The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates; and

Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the director deems necessary for participation in the NMLSR.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-311, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-312. Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry information challenge process.

The director shall establish a process whereby mortgage loan originators may challenge the information entered into the NMLSR by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-312, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-313. Enforcement authority, violations and penalties.

In order to ensure the effective supervision and enforcement of this part, the director may, pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code:

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition or decline to renew a license for a violation of this chapter, or rule or order issued under this chapter;

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition or decline to renew a license if an applicant or licensee under this part fails at any time to meet the requirements of section 26-31-306, Idaho Code, or section 26-31-309, Idaho Code, or withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a license or renewal of a license;

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition or decline to renew a license if the applicant has violated any state or federal law, rule or regulation pertaining to mortgage brokering, mortgage lending or loan origination activities;

Order restitution against persons subject to this part for violations of this part;

Impose penalties on persons subject to this part pursuant to subsections (2) through (4) of this section; and

Issue orders under this part as follows:

Order persons subject to this part to cease and desist from conducting business, including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist;

Order persons subject to this part to cease any harmful activities or violations of this part, including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist;

Enter immediate temporary orders to cease business under a license or interim license issued pursuant to this part, if the director determines that such license was erroneously granted or the licensee is currently in violation of this part;

Order such other affirmative action as the director deems necessary.

The director may impose a civil penalty upon a mortgage loan originator or other person subject to this part if the director finds on the record, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, that such mortgage loan originator or other person subject to this part has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this part or any rule promulgated or order issued by the director under this chapter and pertinent to this part.

The maximum amount of penalty for each act or omission described in subsection (2) of this section shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

Each violation of this part, or failure to comply with any rule promulgated or order issued by the director under this chapter and pertinent to this part, is a separate and distinct violation or failure.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-313, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-314. Remedies available to the department.

If the director determines that a person subject to this part has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of the truth in lending act, the real estate settlement procedures act, regulation X, regulation Z or of this part or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part, then the director may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction, and upon a showing of any violation, there shall be granted any or all of the following:

A writ or order restraining or enjoining, temporarily or permanently, any act or practice violating any provision of this part or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part, and to enforce compliance with this part or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part;

An order that the person violating any provision of this part, or a rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part pay a civil penalty to the department in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation;

An order allowing the director to recover costs, which may include investigative expenses and attorney’s fees;

A declaratory judgment that a particular act, practice or method is a violation of the provisions of this part;

Other appropriate remedies including restitution to borrowers.

If the director finds that a person subject to this part has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate the provisions of this part, or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part, the director may, in his discretion, order the person to cease and desist from the violations.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-314, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-315. Confidentiality.

In order to promote effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

Except as otherwise provided in section 1512, P.L. 110-289, the requirements under any federal law or chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the NMLSR, and any privilege arising under federal or Idaho state law, including the rules of any federal or Idaho state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the NMLSR. Such information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials having mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

For these purposes, the director is authorized to enter into agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the conference of state bank supervisors, the American association of residential mortgage regulators or other associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule or order of the director.

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subsection (1) of this section shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the NMLSR with respect to such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that privilege.

Coordination with chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in subsection (1) of this section that is inconsistent with subsection (1) shall be superseded by the requirements of this section.

This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the NMLSR for access by the public.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-315, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 47, p. 379.